Utah statutes.
32A-7-101.   Commission's power to issue permits -- Limitations.
(1)  The commission may issue a single event permit to any of the following
that is conducting a convention, civic, or community enterprise, a bona fide:
(a)  partnership;
(b)  corporation;
(c)  limited liability company;
(d)  church;
(e)  political organization;
(f)  incorporated association;
(g)  recognized subordinate lodge, chapter, or other local unit of an entity
described in Subsections (1)(a) through (f);
(h)  state agency; or
(i)  political subdivision of the state including:
(i)  a county; or
(ii)  a municipality.
(2) (a)  A single event permit may authorize:
(i) the storage, sale, service, and consumption of liquor at an event at which
the storage, sale, service, or consumption of liquor is otherwise prohibited
by this title for either:
(A)  a time period not to exceed 120 consecutive hours; or
(B)  a time period not to exceed 72 consecutive hours; and
(ii)  the storage, sale, service, and consumption of beer at the same event
for the period that the storage, sale, service, or consumption of liquor is
authorized under Subsection (2)(a)(i) for the single event permit.
(b)  The single event permit shall state in writing whether it is for a time
period described in Subsection (2)(a)(i)(A) or (2)(a)(i)(B).
(3)  The commission may not issue more than:
(a)  four single event permits in any one calendar year to the same person
listed in Subsection (1) if one or more of the single event permits is for a
time period described in Subsection (2)(a)(i)(A); or
(b)  12 single event permits in any one calendar year to the same person
listed in Subsection (1) if each of the single event permits issued to that
person is for a time period described in Subsection (2)(a)(i)(B).
(4) (a)  The 600 foot and 200 foot proximity requirements in relation to a
community location that are applicable to a state store, package agency, or
licensee, do not apply to a single event permit.
(b) Notwithstanding Subsection (4)(a), nothing in this section prevents the
commission from considering the proximity of an educational, religious, or
recreational facility, or any other relevant factor in deciding whether to
issue a single event permit.
(5)  For calendar year 2008, the commission shall grant the number of single
event permits to the same person described in Subsection (1) that the
commission determines is most similar to the restriction in Subsection (3),
except in no case may the commission issue more than 12 single event permits
to the same person in calendar year 2008.
